Utah statutes.
58-55-201.   Boards created -- Duties.
(1)  There is created a Plumbers Licensing Board, an Alarm System Security and
Licensing Board, and an Electricians Licensing Board.  Members of the boards
shall be selected to provide representation as follows:
(a)  The Plumbers Licensing Board consists of five members as follows:
(i)  two members shall be licensed from among the license classifications of
master or journeyman plumber;
(ii)  two members shall be licensed plumbing contractors; and
(iii)  one member shall be from the public at large with no history of
involvement in the construction trades.
(b) (i)  The Alarm System Security and Licensing Board consists of five
members as follows:
(A)  three individuals who are officers or owners of a licensed alarm
business;
(B)  one individual from among nominees of the Utah Peace Officers
Association; and
(C)  one individual representing the general public.
(ii)  The Alarm System Security and Licensing Board shall designate one of its
members on a permanent or rotating basis to:
(A)  assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or
unprofessional conduct of a licensee; and
(B)  advise the division in its investigation of these complaints.
(iii)  A board member who has, under this Subsection (1)(b)(iii), reviewed a
complaint or advised in its investigation is disqualified from participating
with the board when the board serves as a presiding officer in an adjudicative
proceeding concerning the complaint.
(c)  The Electricians Licensing Board consists of five members as follows:
(i)  two members shall be licensed from among the license classifications of
master or journeyman electrician, of whom one shall represent a union
organization and one shall be selected having no union affiliation;
(ii)  two shall be licensed electrical contractors of whom one shall represent
a union organization and one shall be selected having no union affiliation;
and
(iii)  one member shall be from the public at large with no history of
involvement in the construction trades or union affiliation.
(2)  The duties, functions, and responsibilities of each board include the
following:
(a)  recommending to the commission appropriate rules;
(b)  recommending to the commission policy and budgetary matters;
(c)  approving and establishing a passing score for applicant examinations;
(d)  overseeing the screening of applicants for licensing, renewal,
reinstatement, and relicensure;
(e)  assisting the commission in establishing standards of supervision for
students or persons in training to become qualified to obtain a license in the
occupation or profession it represents; and
(f)  acting as presiding officer in conducting hearings associated with the
adjudicative proceedings and in issuing recommended orders when so authorized
by the commission.
